Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Kentucky Heritage Council

171.3801.
Kentucky Heritage Council — Members — Officers — Meetings — Heritage division — Reorganization prohibited.

There is established the Kentucky Heritage Council (hereinafter referred to as “the council”) which shall perform the functions specified in KRS

171.381

.

The membership of the council shall consist of not more than sixteen (16) members who have an interest in the preservation and protection of Kentucky’s heritage. On or before September 15, 1982, the Governor shall appoint not more than four (4) members for a term of one (1) year, not more than four (4) members for a term of two (2) years, not more than four (4) members for a term of three (3) years, and not more than four (4) members for a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, the Governor shall make all appointments for a term of four (4) years.

Council members shall receive no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

From the council membership the Governor shall appoint a chairman and a vice chairman of the council. The council may elect by majority vote other officers deemed necessary.

The council shall meet at the call of the chairman, but not less often than twice during each calendar year. A majority of the members appointed to the council shall constitute a quorum.

The council shall be attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet for administrative purposes.

The Heritage Council shall include a heritage division, whose duties shall include providing staff services needed by the Heritage Council in order to perform its duties under KRS

171.381

, including but not limited to preserving and protecting buildings, sites and other landmarks associated with the archaeological, cultural, economic, military, national, political and social aspects of Kentucky’s history.

The heritage division shall be headed by a director appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) nominees submitted by the Heritage Council; and the Heritage Council and the heritage division shall not be subject to reorganization.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 396, § 38, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 209, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 95, § 36, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 45, effective June 25, 2009.

171.381.
Duties and functions of council — Duties of state historic preservation officer.

The Kentucky Heritage Council shall be dedicated to the preservation and protection of all meaningful vestiges of Kentucky’s heritage for succeeding generations, and in pursuit of this dedication it shall engage in and concern itself with worthy projects and other matters related to the conservation and continuing recognition of buildings, structures, sites, and other landmarks associated with the archaeological, cultural, economic, military, natural, political, or social aspects of Kentucky’s history.

The duties and functions of the council shall be to:

Review and recommend appropriate projects and programs to insure the proper recognition, preservation, and protection of matters related to Kentucky’s heritage, particularly those in the nature of or associated with real property;

Advise, consult, and cooperate generally with state, local, and national officials and agencies to accomplish the purposes to which the council is dedicated, and specifically with the Kentucky Department of Parks and Historical Society in matters of common concern;

Encourage, promote, and coordinate historic preservation programs being conducted in Kentucky by other agencies or groups, public and private;

Prepare and maintain an inventory or survey of Kentucky’s resource of historic buildings, sites, structures, and other landmarks, and list in an official roll those landmarks which possess statewide or national significance; and

Conduct a survey and maintain a catalog of Kentucky’s historic drylaid and historic mortared rock fences as defined in KRS

171.391

.

The council may:

Accept grants or other funds or property from any available source, public or private;

Employ, with the approval of the Governor, staff as may be necessary. Any member of the staff shall be entitled to compensation under KRS Chapter 18A, and may be reimbursed for necessary and actual expenses in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 44 and 45;

Enter into contractual relationships as may be necessary;

Acquire real property, by gift or devise or by purchase pursuant to the provisions of KRS

45A.045

, and hold the same in the name of the Commonwealth for the use and benefit of the council;

Initiate its own projects of an appropriate nature, and undertake or otherwise engage in joint projects with other agencies or groups, public or private; and

Adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary and incidental to the performance of the council’s duties and functions.

The receipt, control, and expenditure of funds shall be subject to the general provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes governing financial administration of all state agencies.

No provision of this section shall be construed as repealing any of the laws of the Commonwealth relating to the preservation, protection, and recognition of historical matters, but shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental thereto.

The council shall receive applications, interview and recommend to the Governor three (3) persons as nominees for appointment as the director of the Heritage Division, Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet. The director of the Heritage Division shall be the state historic preservation officer.

The responsibilities of the state historic preservation officer shall include:

Development for the State Historic Preservation Program;

Direction of a comprehensive statewide survey of historic properties;

Nomination of historic properties to the National Register of Historic Places;

Cooperation in the development of effective working relationships with federal, state, and local agencies that participate in the management of historic properties and in project planning that may affect historic properties;

Cooperation in the integration of historic preservation planning with all levels of planning;

Cooperation in the development and maintenance of a review procedure for publicly funded, assisted, and licensed undertakings that may affect historic properties within the state;

Participation in the review of federal, federally assisted, and federally licensed undertakings that may affect historic properties included in or eligible for inclusion in the National Register under Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act and Executive Order 11593;

Assisting federal agencies in fulfilling their historic preservation responsibilities under federal law and regulations;

Liaison with organizations of professional archaeologists, historians, architects, architectural historians, planners, and others concerned with historic preservation;

Development and operation of a program of public information and education concerning the preservation program;

Administration of the grants program within the state;

Preparation and maintenance of a comprehensive statewide historic preservation plan; and

The immediate transmittal to the Department of Parks and to the Commonwealth’s Railtrail Development Office in the Department for Local Government of any information received from a railroad or other person having an ownership interest in a railroad corridor pertaining to a proposed or pending action or proceeding to obtain federal authority for the regulatory abandonment of that railroad corridor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 87, § 3; 1976, ch. 32, § 1; 1978, ch. 154, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 396, § 39, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 142, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 496, § 54, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 209, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 338, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 211, § 110, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 11, § 4, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 47, § 80, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 16, § 46, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 117, § 76, effective July 15, 2010.

171.382.
Proposed nomination to National Register of Historic Places — Notice — Hearing.

Prior to deciding whether to nominate a district, site, building, or object to the National Register of Historic Places created by the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, the Kentucky Historic Preservation Review Board and the Kentucky Heritage Commission shall afford persons desiring to comment on the proposed nomination the opportunity to be heard by the board, in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

The Kentucky Heritage Commission shall give public notice of the proposed nomination of any district, site, building, or object to the National Register of Historic Places before such nomination is presented to the Kentucky Historic Preservation Review Board. The notice shall be published in the county in which the district, site, building, or object is located in accordance with KRS Chapter 424, except that the notice shall be published only one (1) time, at least thirty (30) days prior to the review board’s consideration of the nomination. The notice shall state the time and place of the meeting at which the nomination is to be considered and shall indicate that any person desiring to be heard by the historic preservation review board shall be afforded the opportunity to comment on the proposed nomination.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 22, § 1.

171.383.
Designation of covered wooden bridges as shrines.

All covered wooden bridges within the state shall be designated as state shrines by the heritage division according to the procedures of the agency. Each covered wooden bridge shall be identified as such by an official marker placed by the Kentucky Historical Society.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 364, § 1; 1976, ch. 170, § 1; 1982, ch. 396, § 40, effective July 15, 1982.

171.384.
Historic preservation review board created — Members — Compensation.

There is hereby established the Kentucky Historic Preservation Review Board, which shall aid and advise the heritage division in the selection of historic sites and all duties pursuant to Public Law 89-665, as amended, and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

The board shall be composed of eleven (11) members appointed by the Governor; one (1) of whom shall be a professionally recognized historian; one (1) an architect; and one (1) an archaeologist. Each board member shall receive twenty-five dollars ($25) per diem and necessary expenses for performance of his duties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 113, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 396, § 41, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 104, effective July 13, 1984.

171.385.
Washington, Kentucky Historic Township Commission — Creation.

In order to preserve, augment and engender the historic qualities of Washington, Mason County, Kentucky, there is hereby created the Washington, Kentucky Historic Township Commission to devise a plan and undertake the general restoration and development of Washington, Kentucky, as a late eighteenth and early nineteenth century frontier town.

The Washington, Kentucky Historic Township Commission, hereinafter referred to as the commission, shall consist of eleven (11) members to be appointed by the Governor from among the citizens of Washington and Mason County. The commission shall elect one (1) of its members chairman and one (1) of its members vice chairman.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 397, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

There is no binding legal relationship between the Washington Commission and the Kentucky Heritage Commission (now Heritage Council) created by KRS

171.381

but they should coordinate their efforts and the Heritage Commission, if asked, acts in an advisory but not a supervisory capacity to the Washington Commission.

OAG 75-80

.

171.387.
Commission membership — Powers — Personnel.

The commission may employ a director, who shall serve as its secretary and at its pleasure, and other technical assistants as may be necessary to carry out its purposes.

The commission may contract, lease, accept gifts and bequests of money and acquire real and personal property by gift, purchase, devise, or bequests, deemed necessary for the proper development and planning of Washington as a historic town, and may preserve, restore, and administer these properties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 397, § 2.

171.388.
Kentucky Register of Heritage Farms.

As used in this section, “structure” means a house, barn, shed, crib, silo, windmill, fence, or cemetery marker.

The heritage division shall establish the Kentucky Register of Heritage Farms. A heritage farm shall comprise at least forty (40) acres and (a) shall have been owned and farmed by the same family for more than one hundred (100) years or, (b) shall include at least one structure more than fifty (50) years old.

Designation of a farm as a Kentucky Heritage Farm under this section shall not restrict the sale, alteration, use, or the exercise of any other right of ownership.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 396, § 42, effective July 15, 1982.

171.390.
Report of activities required from commission.

The commission shall, within two (2) years of June 21, 1974, submit a written report to the Governor and the General Assembly. The report shall set out, in such detail as may be necessary; the property, historic sites, and buildings to be incorporated into the plan; the manner and method by which the property, sites, and buildings may be restored, preserved, maintained, and operated; the amount of money which will have to be expended for the restoration and maintenance of any property; and the sources from which funds may be derived for these purposes. The commission may seek what state and federal funds are available to aid in the development of the plan and the actual restoration and preservation of Washington as a historic town.

The submission of the commission’s report, required by subsection (1) of this section, shall not conclude the business for which it is created and the commission may continue to exist and perform its designated functions until such time as the Governor may terminate its existence. Upon termination of the commission, all real and personal property held by the commission, remaining after payment of, or provision for payment of, all debts and liabilities of the commission shall become the property of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for the purposes of the Department of Parks or the property of Old Washington, Incorporated, as determined by the commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 397, § 3.

171.391.
Definitions for KRS 171.391 to 171.393.

As used in KRS

171.391

to

171.393

:

“Council” means the Kentucky Heritage Council;

“Historic drylaid rock fence” means any drylaid stone fence or wall at least fifty (50) years old that was originally constructed from natural stones and without mortar;

“Historic mortared rock fence” means any rock fence at least fifty (50) years old that was originally constructed from natural stones and mortar; and

“Nonhistoric drylaid rock fence” means any rock fence constructed within the last fifty (50) years from natural stones and without mortar that the Kentucky Heritage Council certifies meets the guidelines for drystone masonry set forth by the Dry Stone Conservancy.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 11, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

171.392.
Rock fence preservation fund.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a rock fence preservation fund, which shall be administered by the council. The fund may receive appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, revolving funds, and any other funds from public and private sources, to be used for reconstruction and repair of the Commonwealth’s historic drylaid rock fences and historic mortared rock fences.

Moneys deposited in the fund shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer under the Rock Fence Preservation Program established in KRS

171.393

.

Fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year. Income earned from investment of the fund shall become part of the fund and shall not lapse.

Amounts deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in KRS

171.391

to

171.393

, and in no case shall the funds be used for executive agency administrative costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 11, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). The numbering of subsections in this section has been altered from the numbering of 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 11, sec. 2 by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

171.393.
Rock Fence Preservation Program — Administrative regulations — Limitation on use of grant funds.

The Rock Fence Preservation Program is established and shall be administered by the council. The council shall seek guidance on all technical issues regarding rock fence preservation from the Dry Stone Conservancy. The program shall provide funding for the preservation of historic drylaid rock fences and historic mortared rock fences.

The council shall promulgate administrative regulations in consultation with the Dry Stone Conservancy relating to the establishment of a grant program, including:

Application and reporting procedures;

Accountability criteria for grant recipients; and

Grant appropriation amounts and eligible expenditures.

No funds from the program established in this section shall be utilized for restoration projects which utilize stone removed, harvested, or taken from other historic stone structures without prior approval of the Kentucky Heritage Council in consultation with the Dry Stone Conservancy.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 11, § 3, effective June 26, 2007.

171.394.
Kentucky battlefield preservation fund — Purposes and uses — Grants program — Eligible costs — Easements — Duties of council.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be known as the Kentucky battlefield preservation fund.

The account shall consist of moneys received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.

The account shall be administered by the Kentucky Heritage Council.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, moneys in the account not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the account shall become a part of the account and shall not lapse.

Moneys deposited into the account are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section and shall not be appropriated or transferred by the General Assembly for any other purposes.

Amounts deposited in the account shall be used exclusively by the Kentucky Heritage Council to provide grants. Grants shall be made to private nonprofit organizations.

All grants shall be made solely for the fee simple purchase of, or purchase of protective interests in:

Any Kentucky battlefield site considered in:

The report issued by the Civil War Sites Advisory Commission, National Park Service, 1993, as amended, entitled Report on the Nation’s Civil War Battlefields; or

The report prepared by the American Battlefield Protection Program, National Park Service, U.S. Department of the Interior, September 2007, as amended, entitled Report to Congress on the Historic Preservation of Revolutionary War and War of 1812 Sites in the United States; or

Any site associated with the Underground Railroad that is eligible for National Historic Landmark designation or for listing in the National Register of Historic Places.

Private nonprofit organizations seeking grant funding from the account shall be required to provide matching funds from any non-state sources on a dollar-for-dollar basis.

For the purposes of this subsection, “matching funds” means cash or the donation of land, or interest therein, made by the landowner as part of the proposed project.

No state funds may be included in determining the amount of the match.

Grants from the account shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the appraised value of the land or permanent protective interests therein.

Grants from the account may be awarded for prospective purchases.

Eligible costs for which moneys from the account may be allocated include:

Acquisition of land and any improvements thereon;

Permanent protective interests;

Conservation easements;

Costs of appraisals;

Environmental reports;

Surveys;

Title searches and title insurance; and

Any other closing costs.

Any eligible organization making an acquisition of land or interest therein shall grant to the Commonwealth a perpetual easement placing restrictions on the use or development of the land.

All terms and conditions of the easement shall be reviewed by and found by the Kentucky Heritage Council to be consistent with other conservation easements under KRS

67A.840

to

67A.850

.

Any eligible organization shall demonstrate to the Kentucky Heritage Council that it has the capacity and expertise to manage and enforce the terms of the easement.

The Kentucky Heritage Council shall:

Establish, administer, manage, and make expenditures and allocations from the account;

Establish guidelines for applications for grants of moneys from the account;

Prioritize and award grants of moneys from the account; and

Consider in relation to core and study areas of the sites identified in subsection (7)(b) of this section:

The significance of the site;

The location of the proposed project;

The proximity to other protected lands;

The threat to and integrity of the features associated with the historic significance of the site; and

The financial and administrative capacity of the applicant to complete the project and to maintain and manage the property consistent with the public investment and public interest, including:

Education;

Recreation;

Research;

Heritage tourism promotion; or

Orderly community development.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the subsequent transfer of property acquired under this section to the United States of America, its agencies, or instrumentalities.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

171.395.
Official museums.

The Thomas Edison Butchertown House in Louisville shall be designated as the official Edison Museum in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The Kentucky Railway Museum shall be designated as the official railway museum in the State of Kentucky.

The official museums shall be so designated by an official marker erected by the Kentucky Historical Society.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 167, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 87, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 396, § 43, effective July 15, 1982.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by 1982 Acts Ch. 396, Section 43 and by 1982 Acts Ch. 87, Section 1, which are partially in conflict. Effect has been given to the substantive changes made by the General Assembly.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Kentucky Railway Museum does not qualify as an educational institution so as to be exempt from the ad valorem property tax or sales and use tax.

OAG 76-586

.